Washington statutes.
RCW 23.78.030

Revocation of election.

An employee cooperative may revoke its election under this chapter by a vote of two-thirds of the members and through articles of amendment delivered to the secretary of state for filing in accordance with RCW 23B.01.200, 23B.10.060, and Article 2 of chapter 23.95 RCW.

[ 2015 c 176 s 9102; 1991 c 72 s 10; 1987 c 457 s 4.]

NOTES:

Effective date—Contingent effective date—2015 c 176: See note following RCW 23.95.100.